California, session 20252026, SB967.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 65583.05 of the Government Code is amended to read:65583.05. (a) (1) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall publish, by December 31, 2026, advisory guidance, including, but not limited to, sample analyses and programs, pertaining to both of the following:(A) Special housing needs for acutely low and extremely low income households, as described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 65583.(B) Programs to assist in the development of adequate housing to meet the needs of acutely low income households, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 65583.(2) The guidance described in paragraph (1) shall provide advice regarding the impact of the statutory requirements pertaining to acutely low and extremely low income households on both all of the following:(A) Compliance with the requirements in Section 65583 to analyze potential and actual governmental constraints and, where appropriate and legally possible, remove governmental constraints.(B) Compliance with Section 65583.5, including specifying how interim housing, as defined in Section 65583.5, that does not meet the United States Census Bureau guidelines definition of a “housing unit” may be reported in the annual progress report.(B)(C) Residential development project financial or other factors that impact feasibility.(b) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall publish, by December 31, 2026, advisory guidance to be used by each council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, to develop a proposed methodology for allocating the regional housing need for acutely low and extremely low income households to cities, counties, and cities and counties within the region or within the subregion pursuant to Section 65584.04.SEC. 2. Section 65583.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:65583.5. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Interim housing” means a noncongregate and relocatable low barrier navigation center as that term is defined in Section 65660.(2) “Committed support for interim housing” means that the city or county enters into a legally enforceable agreement that lasts until the end of the planning cycle that obligates sufficient available funds or other in-kind services to provide the assistance necessary to make the identified interim housing units available for occupancy for the duration of the planning period.(b) (1) For the purposes of subclause (II) of clause (i) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 65400, a city or county that provides committed support for interim housing may report the number of interim housing units receiving that support that are approved.(2) Any interim housing units that are relocated out of the jurisdiction, or that are no longer available for occupancy, shall be reported pursuant to subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 65400.(c) (1) The department shall allow approved interim housing units to account for up to 50 percent of the city’s or county’s share of the regional need for housing for acutely low income households allocated pursuant to Section 65584.(2) (A) Interim housing units identified pursuant to paragraph (1) shall count for the planning cycle during which the units are approved.(B) Interim housing units that are reported as relocated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall be removed from the total number of units approved to meet the city’s or county’s share of the regional need for housing for acutely low income households.(d) The section shall only apply to a city or county that met or exceeded its need for emergency shelter capacity identified in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 65583.SECTION 1.Section 65582 of the Government Code is amended to read:65582.As used in this article, the following definitions apply unless specified otherwise:(a)“Above moderate income” means income exceeding the moderate-income level described in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.(b)“Acutely low income” has the same meaning as in Section 50063.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(c)“All income levels” or “all household income levels” means lower income, moderate income, and above moderate income levels.(d)“Community,” “locality,” “local government,” or “jurisdiction” means a city, city and county, or county.(e)“Council of governments” means a single or multicounty council created by a joint powers agreement pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1.(f)“Department” means the Department of Housing and Community Development.(g)“Emergency shelter” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 50801 of the Health and Safety Code.(h)“Extremely low income” means the income for households exceeding the income limit for acutely low income households, as defined in this section, and does not exceed the limit for extremely low income households, as defined in Section 50106 of the Health and Safety Code.(i)“Frequent user coordinated care housing services” means housing combined with other supportive services for homeless persons identified by a city or county as the most costly, frequent users of publicly funded emergency services.(j)“Housing element” or “element” means the housing element of the community’s general plan, as required pursuant to this article and subdivision (c) of Section 65302.(k)For the seventh and subsequent revisions of the housing element, with respect to acutely low income households, “housing unit” or “unit” means a house, an apartment, a modular home, a mobilehome or trailer, a group of rooms, or a single room that is occupied, or, if vacant, is intended for occupancy as separate living quarters. For purposes of this subdivision:(1)Separate living quarters are those in which the occupants have sleeping quarters separate from any other persons in the building and that have direct access from the outside of the building or through a common hall. Separate living quarters does not require separate bathrooms or eating spaces.(2)A housing unit described in this subdivision may be for permanent or transitional housing, as defined in Section 50801 of the Health and Safety Code.(l)“Low income” means the income for households exceeding the income limit for very low income households, as defined in this section, and does not exceed the income limit for lower income households, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(m)“Lower income” means income that is low income, very low income, extremely low income, or acutely low income.(n)“Moderate income” means the income for households exceeding the limit for lower income households, as defined in this section, and does not exceed the income limit for moderate-income households, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.(o)“Supportive housing” means housing with no limit on length of stay, that is occupied by the target population, and that is linked to an onsite or offsite service that assists the supportive housing resident in retaining the housing, improving their health status, and maximizing their ability to live and, when possible, work in the community.(p)“Supportive services” include, but are not limited to, a combination of subsidized, permanent housing, intensive case management, medical and mental health care, substance abuse treatment, employment services, and benefits advocacy.(q)“Target population” means persons with low incomes who have one or more disabilities, including mental illness, HIV or AIDS, substance abuse, or other chronic health condition, or individuals eligible for services provided pursuant to the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) of the Welfare and Institutions Code) and may include, among other populations, adults, emancipated minors, families with children, elderly persons, young adults aging out of the foster care system, individuals exiting from institutional settings, veterans, and homeless people.(r)“Transitional housing” means buildings configured as rental housing developments, but operated under program requirements that require the termination of assistance and recirculating of the assisted unit to another eligible program recipient at a predetermined future point in time that shall be no less than six months from the beginning of the assistance.(s)“Very low income” means income for households exceeding the income limit for extremely low income households, as defined in this section, and does not exceed the income limit for very low income households, as defined in Section 50105 of the Health and Safety Code.SEC. 2.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.